Utah statutes.
13-45-202.   Removal of security freeze -- Requirements and timing.
(1)  A consumer reporting agency may remove a security freeze from a
consumer's credit report only if:
(a) (i)  the consumer reporting agency receives the consumer's request through
a contact method established and required in accordance with Subsection
13-45-201(6); and
(ii)  the consumer reporting agency receives the consumer's proper
identification and:
(A)  other information sufficient to identify the consumer; or
(B)  the consumer provides the consumer's personal identification number or
password; or
(b)  the consumer makes a material misrepresentation of fact in connection
with the placement of the security freeze and the consumer reporting agency
notifies the consumer in writing before removing the security freeze.
(2) (a)  A consumer reporting agency shall temporarily remove a security
freeze upon receipt of:
(i)  the consumer's request through the contact method established by the
consumer reporting agency in accordance with Subsection 13-45-201(6);
(ii)  the consumer's proper identification and:
(A)  other information sufficient to identify the consumer; or
(B)  personal identification number or password;
(iii)  a specific designation of the period of time for which the security
freeze is to be removed; and
(iv)  the consumer reporting agency receives the payment of any fee required
under Section 13-45-204.
(b)  A consumer reporting agency shall remove a security freeze from a
consumer's credit report within:
(i)  three business days after the business day on which the consumer's
written request to remove the security freeze is received by the consumer
reporting agency at the postal address chosen by the consumer reporting agency
in accordance with Subsection 13-45-201(6); or
(ii)  15 minutes after the consumer's request is received by the consumer
reporting agency through the electronic contact method chosen by the consumer
reporting agency in accordance with Subsection 13-45-201(6), or the use of
telephone, during normal business hours and includes the consumer's proper
identification and correct personal identification number or password.
(3)  A consumer reporting agency need not remove a security freeze within the
time provided in Subsection (2)(b)(ii) if:
(a)  the consumer fails to meet the requirements of Subsection 13-45-202(1);
or
(b)  the consumer reporting agency's ability to remove the security freeze
within 15 minutes is prevented by:
(i)  an act of God, including fire, earthquakes, hurricanes, storms, or
similar natural disaster or phenomena;
(ii)  unauthorized or illegal acts by a third party, including terrorism,
sabotage, riot, vandalism, labor strikes or disputes disrupting operations, or
similar occurrence;
(iii)  operational interruption, including electrical failure, unanticipated
delay in equipment or replacement part delivery, computer hardware or software
failures inhibiting response time, or similar disruption;
(iv)  governmental action, including emergency orders or regulations, judicial
or law enforcement action, or similar directives;
(v)  regularly scheduled maintenance, during other than normal business hours,
of, or updates to, the consumer reporting agency's systems;
(vi)  commercially reasonable maintenance of, or repair to, the consumer
reporting agency's systems that is unexpected or unscheduled; or
(vii)  receipt of a removal request outside of normal business hours.
